Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 60 Miscellaneous Proceedings Relating to Property
18-60-307. Proceedings in court.

(a)

When any person to whom any cause of action shall accrue under this subchapter shall file in the office of the clerk of the court a complaint signed by him or her, his or her agent or attorney, specifying the lands, tenements, or other possessions so forcibly entered and detained, or so unlawfully detained over, and by whom and when done, and shall also file the affidavit of himself or herself or some other credible person for him or her, stating that the plaintiff is lawfully entitled to the possession of the lands, tenements, or other possessions mentioned in the complaint and that the defendant forcibly entered upon and detained them or unlawfully detains them, after lawful demand therefor made in the manner described in this subchapter, the clerk of the court shall thereupon issue a summons upon the complaint. The summons shall be in customary form directed to the sheriff of the county in which the cause of action is filed, with direction for service thereof on the named defendants. In addition, he or she shall issue and direct the sheriff to serve upon the named defendants a notice in the following form:

“NOTICE OF INTENTION TO ISSUE WRIT OF POSSESSION You are hereby notified that the attached complaint in the above styled cause claims that you have been guilty of [forcible entry and detainer] [unlawful detainer] (the inapplicable phrase shall be deleted from the notice) and seeks to have a writ of possession directing the sheriff to deliver possession of the lands, tenements, or other possessions described in the complaint delivered to the plaintiff. If, within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, from the date of service of this notice, you have not filed in the office of the clerk of this court a written objection to the claims made against you by the plaintiff for possession of the property described in the complaint, then a writ of possession shall forthwith issue from this office directed to the sheriff of this county and ordering him to remove you from possession of the property described in the complaint and to place the plaintiff in possession thereof. If you should file a written objection to the complaint of the plaintiff and the allegations for immediate possession of the property described in the complaint within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, from the date of service of this notice, a hearing will be scheduled by the court to determine whether or not the writ of possession should issue as sought by the plaintiff. If you continue to possess the property described in the complaint, you are required to deposit into the registry of the court a sum equal to the amount of rent due on the property and continue paying rent into the registry of the court during the pendency of these proceedings in accordance with your written or verbal rental agreement. Your failure to tender the rent due without justification is grounds for the court to grant the writ of possession. Clerk of Circuit/District Court”

Click to view form.

(b)

If, within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, following service of this summons, complaint, and notice seeking a writ of possession against the defendants named therein, the defendant or defendants have not filed a written objection to the claim for possession made by the plaintiff in his or her complaint, the clerk of the court shall immediately issue a writ of possession directed to the sheriff commanding him or her to cause the possession of the property described in the complaint to be delivered to the plaintiff without delay, which the sheriff shall thereupon execute in the manner described in §18-60-310.

(c)(1)

If a written objection to the claim of the plaintiff for a writ of possession shall be filed by the defendant or defendants within five (5) days from the date of service of the notice, summons, and complaint as provided for in this section, the plaintiff shall obtain a date for the hearing of the plaintiff's demand for possession of the property described in the complaint at any time thereafter when the matter may be heard by the court and shall give notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing by certified mail, postage prepaid, either to the defendant or to his or her or their counsel of record.

(2)

If the defendant continues to possess the property described in the plaintiff's complaint during the pendency of the proceedings under this subchapter, the defendant is required to deposit into the registry of the court at the time of filing the written objection a sum equal to the amount of rent due on the property and continue paying rent into the registry of the court in accordance with the written or verbal rental agreement.

(3)

The failure of the defendant to deposit into the registry of the court the rent due or any rent subsequently due during the pendency of the proceeding under this subchapter without justification is grounds for the court to grant the writ of possession.

(d)(1)(A)

If a hearing is required to be held on the demand of the plaintiff for an immediate writ of possession, the plaintiff shall there present evidence sufficient to make a prima facie case of entitlement to possession of the property described in the complaint. The defendant or defendants shall be entitled to present evidence in rebuttal thereof.

(B)(i)

If the court decides upon all the evidence that the plaintiff is likely to succeed on the merits at a full hearing and if the plaintiff provides adequate security as determined by the court, then the court shall order the clerk forthwith to issue a writ of possession to the sheriff to place the plaintiff in possession of the property described in the complaint, subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section.

(ii)

No such action by the court shall be final adjudication of the parties' rights in the action.

(2)

A plaintiff demanding an immediate writ of possession who is a housing authority and who claims in its complaint that the defendant or defendants are being asked to surrender possession as a result of the defendant or defendants having been convicted of a criminal violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, §5-64-101 et seq., shall be entitled to receive an expedited hearing before the court within ten (10) days of the filing of the objection by the defendant or defendants.

(e)

If the defendant desires to retain possession of the property, the court shall allow the retention upon the defendant's providing, within five (5) days of issuance of the writ of possession, adequate security as determined by the court.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1507; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 11, § 1; 2007, No. 535, § 2; 2007, No. 728, §§ 1, 2.

18-60-308. Title to premises not adjudicated.

In trials under the provisions of this subchapter, the title to the premises in question shall not be adjudicated upon or given in evidence, except to show the right to the possession and the extent thereof.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1511.

18-60-309. Judgment for plaintiff — Assessment of damages — Writs of possession and restitution.

(a)

If upon the trial of any action brought under this subchapter the finding or verdict is for the plaintiff, the court or jury trying it shall assess the amount to be recovered by the plaintiff for the rent due and agreed upon at the time of the commencement of the action and up to the time of rendering judgment or, in the absence of an agreement, the fair rental value.

(b)

In addition thereto in all cases the court shall assess the following as liquidated damages:

(1)

When the property sought to be recovered is used for residential purposes only, the plaintiff shall receive an amount equal to the rental value for each month, or portion thereof, that the defendant has forcibly entered and detained or unlawfully detained the property; and

(2)

When the property sought to be recovered is used for commercial or mixed residential and commercial purposes, the plaintiff shall receive liquidated damages at the rate of three (3) times the rental value per month for the time that the defendant has unlawfully detained the property.

(c)(1)

Thereupon the court shall render judgment in favor of the plaintiff for the recovery of the property and for any amount of recovery that may be so assessed with costs.

(2)

If possession of the premises has not already been delivered to the plaintiff, the court shall cause a writ of possession to be issued commanding the sheriff to remove the defendant from possession of the premises and to place the plaintiff in possession thereof.

(d)(1)

In case the finding or verdict is for the defendant, the court shall give judgment thereon with costs and for any damages that may be assessed in favor of the defendant.

(2)

If the property described in the complaint has been turned over to the possession of the plaintiff, the court shall also issue a writ of restitution directed to the sheriff to cause the defendant to be repossessed of the property.

(e)

Any monetary judgments awarded either to the plaintiff or the defendant may be recovered upon in any manner otherwise authorized by law.

(f)

Upon final disposition of the action, the court shall distribute any money paid by the defendant under §18-60-307(c) into the registry of the court first toward satisfaction of the plaintiff's judgment, if any, and the remainder to the defendant.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1509; Acts 2007, No. 728, § 3.

18-60-310. Execution of writ of possession.

(a)

Upon receipt of a writ of possession from the clerk of the court, the sheriff shall immediately proceed to execute the writ in the specific manner described in this section and, if necessary, ultimately by ejecting from the property described in the writ the defendant or defendants and any other person or persons who shall have received or entered into the possession of the property after the issuance of the writ, and thereupon notify the plaintiff that the property has been vacated by the defendant or defendants.

(b)(1)

Upon receipt of the writ, the sheriff shall notify the defendant of the issuance of the writ by delivering a copy thereof to the defendant or to any person authorized to receive summons in civil cases and in like manner.

(2)

If, within eight (8) hours of receipt of the writ of possession, the sheriff shall not find any such person at their normal place of residence, he or she may serve the writ of possession by placing a copy conspicuously upon the front door or other structure of the property described in the complaint, which shall have like effect as if delivered in person pursuant to the terms of this section.

(c)(1)

If, at the expiration of twenty-four (24) hours from the service of the writ of possession in the manner indicated, the defendants or any or either of them shall be and remain in possession of the property or possession has not been returned to the plaintiff, the sheriff shall notify the plaintiff or his or her attorney of that fact and shall be provided with all labor and assistance required by him or her in removing the possessions and belongings of the defendants from the affected property to a place of storage in a public warehouse or in some other reasonable safe place of storage under the control of the plaintiff until a final determination by the court.

(2)

If the determination is in favor of the defendant, then the possessions and belongings of the defendant shall be immediately restored to the defendant with the cost of storage assessed against the plaintiff.

(3)

If the determination is in favor of the plaintiff, and it includes a monetary judgment for the plaintiff, then the court shall order the possessions and belongings of the defendant sold by the plaintiff in a commercially reasonable manner with the proceeds of the sale applied first to the cost of storage, second to any monetary judgment in favor of the plaintiff, and third any excess to be remitted to the defendant.

(d)

In executing the writ of possession, the sheriff shall have the right forcibly to remove all locks or other barriers erected to prevent entry upon the premises in any manner which he or she deems appropriate or convenient and, if necessary, physically to restrain the defendants from interfering with the removal of the defendants' property and possessions from the property described in the writ of possession.

(e)

The plaintiff shall not be required to give any bond, unless ordered to do so by the court, as a condition to the execution of the writ by the sheriff.

(f)

The sheriff shall return the writ at or before the return date of the writ and shall state in his or her return the manner in which he or she executed the writ and whether or not the properties described therein have been delivered to the plaintiff and, if not, the reason for his or her failure to do so.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1508; Acts 1987, No. 577, § 1; 2007, No. 535, § 3.

Cross References.

Landlords' liens, §18-41-101 et seq.

18-60-311. Judgment for defendant.

(a)

In all cases of forcible entry and detainer and unlawful detainer, when the defendant disputes the plaintiff's right of possession, it shall be lawful for the defendant to introduce before the court or the jury trying the main issue in the action evidence showing the damage he or she may have sustained in being dispossessed of the lands and premises mentioned in the complaint.

(b)

The jury, if they find for the defendant, shall at the same time find what damage the defendant has sustained by being dispossessed, if he or she has been so dispossessed, under the provisions of this subchapter, for all of which the court shall render judgment restoring the property to the defendant, as provided for in this subchapter, and shall render judgment against the plaintiff and any surety on any bond posted by the plaintiff for damages as found by the jury, as well as the costs of the suit.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1510.

18-60-312. Other causes of action not precluded.

(a)

Neither the judgment to be rendered by the court in matters brought pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter nor anything in this subchapter shall bar or preclude the party injured from bringing any cause of action for trespass or ejectment, or any other action, against the offending party.

(b)

All claims, causes of action, and actions which have accrued, occurred, or been filed prior to March 23, 1981, and arising under acts repealed shall be, and remain, in full force and effect, but shall be governed by the terms of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 615, §§ 12, 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1512.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1981, No. 615, § 13 is partially codified in this section; the remainder of § 13 was a repealing clause.

Subchapter 4

— Partition and Sale of Land

Cross References.

Local actions, §16-60-102.

Partition of oil and gas lease interests, §15-73-401 et seq.

Preambles.

Acts 1963, No. 518 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the attorney for the petitioners in partition suits prepares the papers, including decrees, distribution, and deeds, etc., in the partition proceedings, and

“Whereas, pretended defenses have been set up by which the courts have not set fees against all interested parties, and

“Whereas, many tracts in this state are not being utilized due to the fact that the movant may have to pay the fees while those who are stifling the property will go free of costs;

“Therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1941, No. 92, § 3: Feb. 25, 1941. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly that the present statute relative to partition of real property in Arkansas, having been enacted many years ago, is inadequate and not broad enough to provide this form of relief in numerous cases in the State of Arkansas, and which are working an unjust hardship upon citizens owning property jointly, in common or in coparceny, absolutely or subject to the life estate of another or otherwise, and that such condition is hindering the alienation of real property and prejudicing the property rights of many citizens. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1947, No. 161, § 3: Mar. 3, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly that the present statute relative to partition of real property in Arkansas, having been enacted many years ago, is inadequate and not broad enough to provide this form of relief in numerous cases in the State of Arkansas, and which are working an unjust hardship upon citizens owning property jointly, in common, or in coparceny, absolute or subject to the life estate of another or otherwise, or under an estate by the entirety, where said owner shall have been divorced either prior or subsequent to the passage of this act, and that such condition is hindering the alienation of real property and prejudicing the property rights of many citizens. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1949, No. 349, § 3: Mar. 21, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “The Fifty-Seventh General Assembly of the State of Arkansas hereby finds and declares that many competent citizens, owners of an interest in real property with an incompetent person, have been denied the right to dispose of such interest when it would have been to the best interest of all concerned to do so; that the denial of such sales, even when supervised by a Court of competent jurisdiction, has prohibited the alienation of property and has unduly worked a hardship upon competent persons owning an interest therein; and, accordingly, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety of the citizens of this State, shall take effect and be in full force from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 518, § 3: Mar. 19, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It having been found by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present law regarding payment of attorney's fees in partition suits is not clear, and that procedure in such matters vary from court to court within this state, thereby working an undue hardship on attorneys and petitioners in partition suits, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 783, § 4: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is no statutory law currently in effect describing in particular those services for which an attorney's fee may be awarded in partition actions and that since such fees are assessed against the defendants as well as the plaintiffs interest in the property, such codification is necessary to protect the interest of all parties involved in a partition lawsuit. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2013, No. 1184, § 3: Apr. 12, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the procedure for selling land in a partition action does not allow a method for listing the property for sale or obtaining the best price for the property through a negotiated sale; that a procedural change to permit more flexibility to obtain the best price for property subject to partition should be authorized for the benefit of owners of real property; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide these benefits to pending and future cases to protect the property rights and interest of owners of real property. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 107, § 4: Jan. 1, 2016.

18-60-401. Petition — Determination of heirs property — Applicability.

(a)

Under this subchapter, any persons having any interest in and desiring a division of land held in joint tenancy, in common, as assigned or unassigned dower, as assigned or unassigned curtesy, or in coparceny, absolutely or subject to the life estate of another, or otherwise, or under an estate by the entirety when the owners have been divorced, except when the property involved is a homestead and occupied by either of the divorced persons, shall file in the circuit court a written petition.

(b)(1)

The petition shall contain:

(A)

The description of the property;

(B)

The names of each party having an interest in the property and the nature and amount of the interest; and

(C)

A prayer for:

(i)

The division and for a sale of the property if it appears that partition cannot be made without great prejudice to the owners; and

(ii)

Any other appropriate relief.

(2)

All persons interested in the property who have not united in the petition shall be summoned to appear.

(c)(1)

The court shall determine whether or not the property is heirs property as defined in §18-60-1002.

(2)

If the court determines after notice and hearing or otherwise that the property is heirs property, the Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act, §18-60-1001 et seq., shall, unless all of the cotenants otherwise agree in a record as defined by §18-60-1002:

(A)

Apply to the partition of the property; and

(B)

To the extent of any conflict between this subchapter and the Uniform Partition of Heirs Property Act, §18-60-1001 et seq., govern the procedures and rights of the parties concerning the heirs property.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, § 1; Civil Code, § 538; C. & M. Dig., § 8091; Pope's Dig., § 10509; Acts 1941, No. 92, § 1; 1947, No. 161, § 1; 1957, No. 324, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1801; Acts 2015, No. 107, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added “Determination of heirs property — Applicability” to the section heading; substituted “subchapter” for “act” in (a); rewrote (b)(1); and added (c).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2015, No. 107, § 4: Jan. 1, 2016.

Partition in Kind.

Section 18-60-414 and this section confer upon the chancellor the authority to decide whether partition in kind is feasible; that is a question of fact, the answer to which depends on evidence of the nature of the land and the nature of the interests of the owners. McNeely v. Bone, 287 Ark. 339, 698 S.W.2d 512 (1985).

18-60-402. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning no verification required, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1464, §
2. The section was derived from Civil Code, §
548; C. & M. Dig., §
8099; Pope's Dig., §
10519; A.S.A. 1947, §
34-1802.

18-60-403. Parties generally.

(a)

Every person having an interest as is specified in §18-60-401, whether in possession or otherwise, and every person entitled to dower or curtesy in the premises, if it has not been admeasured, shall be made a party to the petition.

(b)

In cases in which one (1) or more of the parties, or the share or quantity of interest of any of the parties, is unknown to the petitioner, or uncertain or contingent, or the ownership of the inheritance shall depend upon an executory devise, or the remainder shall be contingent so that the parties cannot be named, it shall be so stated in the petition.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, §§ 3, 4; C. & M. Dig., § 8092; Pope's Dig., §§ 10511, 10512; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1806, 34-1807.

18-60-404. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning restriction on the right to partition for certain purchasers of land, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 107, § 3.
This section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 971, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1839, 34-1840; Acts 1991, No. 759, § 1; 2015, No. 107, §
3.

18-60-405. Guardians for infants or individuals with mental illness.

(a)

The statutory guardian of an infant or of an individual with mental illness may file or unite in the petition in the names of, and in conjunction with, the infant or person of unsound mind.

(b)(1)

If the petition is filed against infants or individuals with mental illness, the guardian may appear and defend for them and protect their interests.

(2)

If the guardian does not, the court shall appoint some discreet person for that purpose.

History.

Civil Code, § 540; C. & M. Dig., § 8095; Pope's Dig., § 10515; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1803.

18-60-406. Court-appointed guardians for minors.

(a)

It shall be lawful for the circuit court of the proper county, for any of the purposes intended by §18-60-401, and before or after any proceedings by virtue thereof, to appoint a guardian for any minor, whether the minor resides in or out of this state. The guardian, for all the purposes of this act, shall have the same powers as any general guardian.

(b)

It shall be the duty of any court appointing any guardian for any minor entitled to any moneys arising from the sale in §§18-60-420 —18-60-423 to require of the guardian a bond to the state, with such security as the court shall deem sufficient, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the duty or trust committed to him or her and that he or she will render a just and true account of his or her guardianship in all courts and places when required.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, §§ 36, 37; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8121, 8122; Pope's Dig., §§ 10543, 10544; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1804, 34-1805.

Meaning of “this act”.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, as amended, codified as §§18-60-401,18-60-403,18-60-406,18-60-408,18-60-411 —18-60-416 and18-60-420 —18-60-424.

18-60-407. Constructive service.

Parties interested may be constructively summoned as provided by Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Civil Code, § 543; C. & M. Dig., § 8098; Pope's Dig., § 10518; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1808; Acts 2013, No. 1148, § 57.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “by Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure” for “§16-58-130”.

18-60-408. Intervention.

Any person having an interest in the premises sought to be divided or sold, whether the interest is present or future, vested or contingent, though not made a party in the petition may appear and, on showing his or her interest by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court, be made a party to the suit for partition.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 8093; Pope's Dig., § 10513; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1809.

18-60-409. Court order for division.

Upon a petition by all interested in the property being filed, or upon a summons being served upon all who have an interest in the property, and who have not united in the petition ten (10) days before commencement of the term, the court may make an order for the division according to the rights of the parties, by commissioners appointed according to law.

History.

Civil Code, § 539; C. & M. Dig., § 8094; Pope's Dig., § 10514; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1810.

18-60-410. Answer.

If any person summoned, as provided in §§18-60-401,18-60-405, and18-60-409, desires to contest the rights of the petitioners or the statements in the petition, he or she shall do so by a written answer, and the questions of law and fact thereupon arising shall be tried and determined by the court.

History.

Civil Code, § 541; C. & M. Dig., § 8097; Pope's Dig., § 10517; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1811.

18-60-411. Entry of default.

If any of the parties duly notified by personal service or publication shall not appear and plead within the time allowed by the court for that purpose, the default shall be entered. The petitioners shall, nevertheless, make out their case by the exhibition to the court of the evidence of their title upon which they claim.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, § 13; C. & M. Dig., § 8096; Pope's Dig., § 10516; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1812.

18-60-412. Judgment.

(a)

The court shall ascertain, from the evidence in case of default or from the confession by answer of the parties, if they appear, and shall declare the rights, titles, and interests of all the parties to the proceedings, petitioners as well as defendants, so far as they shall have appeared.

(b)

The court shall determine the rights of the parties in the lands and tenements and give judgment that partition be made between such of them as shall have any right therein, in accordance with the right thus ascertained.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, § 14; C. & M. Dig., § 8100; Pope's Dig., § 10520; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1813.

18-60-413. No partition contrary to terms of will.

No partition or sale of land, tenements, or hereditaments devised by any last will and testament shall be made, under the provisions of this act, contrary to the intention of any testator as expressed in his or her last will and testament.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, § 34; C. & M. Dig., § 8090; Pope's Dig., § 10508; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1814.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §18-60-406.

Partition Not Found.

Trial court properly dismissed the grandchildren's complaint to set aside a sale and cancel a deed conveying the children's 8/9 interest in the subject property because the restriction on the right of alienability in the testator's will was given to, and was personal to, her surviving children, the conveyance of the children's undivided interest was not a partition of the property, and setting aside the deed would not benefit the grandchildren since they would have the same collective 1/9 interest in the property regardless of the outcome of the litigation.
Graham v. French, 2015 Ark. App. 29, 454 S.W.3d 246 (2015).

18-60-414. Appointment of commissioners.

(a)(1)

Whenever any judgment of partition shall be rendered, the court may, by rule or order, appoint not fewer than three (3) nor more than five (5) commissioners who are residents of the county in which the premises to be divided is situated to make the partition so adjudged, according to the respective rights and interests of the parties, as they were ascertained and determined by the court.

(2)

On such rule or order, the court shall designate the part or shares which shall remain undivided, if any, for the owners whose interest shall be unknown and not ascertained.

(b)

In case of death, resignation, neglect, or refusal to act of any of the commissioners to be appointed as aforesaid, before the duties, trust, and services required of them shall be completed, the court, or judge thereof in vacation, may appoint another commissioner, who shall be vested with the like powers and authority as if he or she had been originally appointed.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, §§ 16, 38; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8101, 8102; Pope's Dig., §§ 10521, 10522; Acts 1983, No. 503, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1815, 34-1816.

Partitions in Kind.

Section 18-60-401 and this section confer upon the chancellor the authority to decide whether partition in kind is feasible; that is a question of fact, the answer to which depends on evidence of the nature of the land and the nature of the interests of the owners. McNeely v. Bone, 287 Ark. 339, 698 S.W.2d 512 (1985).

Cited:

O'Mary v. Dunn, 261 Ark. 323, 547 S.W.2d 758 (1977).

18-60-415. Duties of commissioners.

(a)(1)

The commissioners shall immediately proceed to make partition, according to the judgment of the court, unless it shall appear to them, or a majority of them, that partition of the premises cannot be made without great prejudice to the owners.

(2)

In such a case they shall make report of this fact in court, under their hands, accompanied by an affidavit of the truth of the fact stated in the report so returned.

(b)(1)

In making partition, the commissioners shall divide the lands and tenements, and allot the several portions and shares thereof to the respective parties, quality and quantity relatively being considered by them according to the respective rights and interests of the parties, so adjudged by the court, designating the several shares and portions by metes and bounds.

(2)

The commissioners may, when necessary, employ a surveyor and assistants to assist them.

(c)(1)

The commissioners shall make a full and detailed report of their proceedings, in writing, signed by them, or a majority of them, specifying therein the manner of executing the trust.

(2)(A)

The report shall describe the lands divided and the shares allotted to each party, with the quantity of each share, the boundaries, courses, and distances, together with any other facts necessary for a complete elucidation of the division.

(B)

This report shall be accompanied by the affidavits of the commissioners as may sign the report, verifying the facts set forth therein.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, §§ 17-19; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8103-8105; Pope's Dig., §§ 10523-10525; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1817 — 34-1819.

18-60-416. Court action on commissioners' report.

(a)

Upon a report of the divisions by the commissioners appointed for that purpose being returned, the court may confirm or set aside the report or remand it to the commissioners for correction.

(b)

Upon good cause shown by either party, on the report being made and returned to the circuit court, it may be set aside by the court, who may appoint new commissioners, who shall proceed in like manner as directed in §18-60-415. The court shall not set aside a second report for the same cause for which the first report was set aside.

(c)(1)

If no cause is shown, the report shall be confirmed, and judgment shall thereupon be given that the partition be firm and effectual forever.

(2)

The judgment shall be binding and conclusive on all the parties to the proceedings, their representatives, and all other persons claiming under them by right derived after the commencement of the proceedings.

History.

Civil Code, § 545; Rev. Stat., ch. 107, §§ 20, 21; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8106-8108; Pope's Dig., §§ 10526-10528; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1820 — 34-1822.

18-60-417. Deeds of partition.

On the confirmation of the report of the division of lands, the commissioners, or some commissioner appointed for the purpose, shall make a deed or deeds of partition, conveying to each party the land allotted to him or her in severalty, which shall be approved by the court and recorded as other deeds.

History.

Civil Code, § 546; C. & M. Dig., § 8109; Pope's Dig., § 10529; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1823.

18-60-418. Costs.

The costs of the division shall be apportioned among the parties in the ratio of their interests, and the costs arising from any contest of fact or law shall be paid by the party adjudged to be in the wrong.

History.

Civil Code, § 547; C. & M. Dig., § 8110; Pope's Dig., § 10530; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1824.

18-60-419. Attorney's fees.

(a)(1)

In all suits in any of the courts of this state for partition of lands when a judgment is rendered for partition in kind, or a sale and a partition of the proceeds, the court rendering the judgment or decree shall allow a reasonable fee to the attorney bringing the suit.

(2)

The attorney's fee shall be taxed as part of the costs in the cause and shall be paid pro rata as the other costs are paid according to the respective interests of the parties to the suit in the lands so partitioned.

(b)(1)

When judgment is rendered by a court of this state for partition of realty in kind, or for the sale of realty and partition of the proceeds of the sale, the court in assessing a reasonable fee to be allowed the attorney bringing the action shall consider only those services performed by the attorney requesting a fee which are of common benefit to all parties.

(2)

The court shall assess no fee for services which benefit only one (1) party, such as services necessary for the preparation and trial of contested issues of title or services for which payment has been made by the agreement of the parties.

(c)

In no event shall a fee so assessed and taxed as costs exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000) in total compensation and costs.

(d)

In no event shall a fee be awarded when the trial court shall determine that the attorney seeking the allowance of a fee has an interest in the subject matter property.

(e)

Subsections (b)-(d) of this section shall not be construed as limiting the amount of any fee charged by an attorney to the attorney's client.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 386, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 10531; Acts 1963, No. 518, § 1; 1983, No. 783, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1825 — 34-1825.2.